Arkansas, session 2025, SB287.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 11-9-715 is amended to read as follows:
11-9-715. Fees for legal services.
(a)(1)(A) Fees for legal services rendered in respect of a claim shall
not be valid unless approved by the Workers' Compensation Commission.
(B) Attorney's fees shall be twenty-five percent (25%) of
compensation for indemnity benefits payable to the injured employee or
dependents of a deceased employee. Attorney's fees shall not be awarded on
medical benefits or services except as provided in subdivision (a)(4) of this
section.
(C) Attorney's fees regarding controverted medical
benefits shall be twelve and one-half (12½%) of the controverted medical
benefits up to a maximum fee of five thousand dollars ($5,000).
*ANS195*
03-17-2025 10:03:22 ANS195

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB287
(2)(A) Whenever the commission finds that a claim against the
Treasurer of State, as custodian of the Second Injury Trust Fund or as
custodian of the Death and Permanent Total Disability Trust Fund, has been
controverted, in whole or in part, the commission shall direct that fees for
legal services be paid from the fund, in addition to compensation awarded,
and the fees shall be allowed only on the amount of compensation controverted
and awarded from the fund.
(B)(i)(a) In all other cases whenever the commission finds
that a claim has been controverted, in whole or in part, the commission shall
direct that fees for legal services regarding indemnity benefits be paid to
the attorney for the claimant as follows:
(1) One-half (½) of the fees for legal
services by the employer or carrier in addition to compensation awarded; and
(2) one-half One-half (½) of the fees
for legal services by the injured employee or dependents of a deceased
employee out of compensation payable to them.
(b) The fees for legal services regarding
controverted medical benefits shall be paid by the employer or carrier, in
addition to the medical benefits awarded.
(ii) The fees for legal services shall be allowed
only on the amount of compensation for indemnity benefits controverted and
awarded.
(iii)(a) In all other cases, whenever the commission
finds that a claim has been controverted in whole or in part the commission
shall direct that fees for legal services regarding indemnity benefits be
paid to the attorney for the claimant as follows:
(1) One-half (½) by the employer or
carrier in addition to compensation awarded; and
(2) One-half (½) by the injured employee
or dependents of the deceased employee out of the compensation payable to
them.
(b) Fees for legal services regarding
controverted medical benefits shall be paid by the employer or carrier, in
addition to the medical benefits awarded.
(iii)(iv) However, the commission shall not find
that a claim has been controverted if the claimant or his or her
03-17-2025 10:03:22 ANS195

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB287
representative has withheld from the respondent during the period of time
allotted for the respondent to determine its position any medical information
in his or her possession which substantiates the claim.
(C)(i) Whenever the commission finds that a claim has not
been controverted but further finds that bona fide legal services have been
rendered in respect to the claim, then the commission shall direct the
payment of the fees by the injured employee or dependents of a deceased
employee out of the compensation awarded.
(ii) In determining the amount of fees when a claim
is not controverted, the commission shall use its discretion in awarding an
attorney's fee not to exceed twenty-five percent (25%) and in so doing shall
take into consideration the nature, length, and complexity of the services
performed and the benefits resulting to the compensation beneficiaries.
(3) In any case where attorney's fees are allowed by the
commission, the limitations expressed in the first sentence herein
subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall apply.
(4) Medical providers may voluntarily contract with the attorney
for the claimant to recover disputed bills, and the attorney may charge a
reasonable fee to the medical provider as a cost of collection.
(b)(1) If the claimant prevails on appeal, the attorney for the
claimant shall be entitled to an additional fee at the full commission and
appellate court levels in addition to the fees provided in subdivision (a)(1)
of this section, the additional fee to be paid equally by the employer or
carrier and by the injured employee or dependents of a deceased employee, as
provided above and set by the commission or appellate court.
(2) The maximum fees allowable pursuant to this subsection shall
be the sum of five hundred dollars ($500) two thousand five hundred dollars
($2,500) on appeals to the full commission from a decision of the
administrative law judge and the sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000) five
thousand dollars ($5,000) on appeals to the Court of Appeals or Supreme Court
from a decision of the commission.
(3) In determining the amount of fees, the commission and the
court shall take into consideration the nature, length, and complexity of the
services performed and the benefits resulting to the compensation
beneficiary.
(c)(1) The fee for legal services rendered by the claimant's attorney
03-17-2025 10:03:22 ANS195

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB287
in connection with a change of physician requested by the injured employee,
controverted by the employer or carrier and awarded by the commission, shall
be two hundred dollars ($200) one thousand dollars ($1,000).
(2) No additional fee shall An additional fee shall not be
payable with respect to uncontroverted charges incurred in connection with
treatment by the new physician.
(d)(1) No fees Fees for legal services rendered by the claimant's
attorney with respect to the preliminary conference procedure shall not be
awarded by the commission.
(2) However, the claimant's attorney or other representative may
charge a reasonable fee to the claimant for representation in connection with
the conference.
(3) Unless compensability of a claim is controverted by the
employer or carrier, fees for legal services by the claimant's attorney with
respect to disability for loss of wage-earning capacity shall be payable only
for amounts awarded at a contested hearing which exceed the amount, if any,
which the employer or carrier agreed in writing to accept at the preliminary
conference.
(e) The amendments made by this act of 2001 Acts 2001, No. 1281,
regarding attorney's fees contained in this section shall be effective with
respect to benefits payable in connection with disability or death due to
injuries occurring on or after July 1, 2001, and before the effective date of
this act.
(f) The amendments made by this act regarding attorney fees contained
in this section shall be effective with respect to benefits payable in
connection with disability or death due to injuries occurring on or after the
effective date of this act.

/s/J. Payton







03-17-2025 10:03:22 ANS195